Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2001
Act, how cited.

Sections 13-2001 to 13-2043 shall be known and may be cited as the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1207, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 143, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB202, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB632, § 2.